Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-135
Autopsy; cost; payment.

Except as provided in section 23-1824, in all death claims, where the cause of death is obscure or disputed, any interested party may require an autopsy, the cost of such autopsy to be borne by the party demanding the same.

Laws 1913, c. 198, § 35, p. 594;

R.S.1913, § 3676;

C.S.1922, § 3058;

C.S.1929, § 48-135;

R.S.1943, § 48-135;

Laws 1999, LB 46, § 3.